Washington statutes.
RCW 36.69.210

L.I.D.'s—Initiation by resolution or petition.

Local improvement districts may be initiated either (1) by resolution of the board of park and recreation commissioners, or, (2) by petition signed by the owners (according to the county auditor's records) of at least fifty-one percent of the area of land within the limits of the local improvement district to be created.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.69.210. Prior: 1957 c 58 s 22.]